Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.074

Application—Request for improvements to existing highways—Procedures.

(1) An application to the board from a political subdivision may also include a request for improvements to an existing state highway or highways. The application is subject to all of the applicable criteria relative to qualifying types of development set forth in this chapter, as well as procedures and criteria established by the board.

(2) Before board consideration of an application from a political subdivision that includes a request for improvements to an existing state highway or highways, the application shall be forwarded by the board to the department of transportation.

(3) The board may not make its final determination on any application made under subsection (1) of this section before receiving approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval from the department of transportation as specified in RCW 47.01.280. Notwithstanding its disposition of the remainder of any such application, the board may not approve a request for improvements to an existing state highway or highways without the approval as submitted or amended of the department of transportation as specified in RCW 47.01.280.

(4) The board shall notify the department of transportation of its decision regarding any application made under this section.

[ 2008 c 327 s 7; 1985 c 433 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: See note following RCW 43.160.010.

Nonseverability—1985 c 433: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the entire act and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is invalid and of no further force and effect." [ 1985 c 433 s 10.]